Washington statutes.
RCW 36.76.130

Act cumulative.

*This act shall not be construed as repealing or affecting any other act relating to the issuance of bonds for road or other purposes, but shall be construed as conferring additional power and authority.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.76.130. Prior: 1913 c 25 s 7; RRS s 5598.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "This act" [1913 c 25] consists of RCW 36.76.080, 36.76.090, 36.76.100, 36.76.110, 36.76.120, and 36.76.130.